Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10 Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System
24-10-504. Forfeiture and restoration. [Effective January 1, 2020.]

When a member is no longer employed by any employer in covered employment, he or she shall cease to be a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, upon termination of his or her membership his or her credited service shall be forfeited by him or her.

If the person becomes reemployed by any employer in covered employment, he or she shall again become a member of the system under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.

Upon his or her reemployment, his or her credited service last forfeited by him or her shall be restored to his or her credit, but only if he or she returns to the system the amount, if any, he or she withdrew from the system, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

Upon a member's retirement, he or she shall cease to be a member.

Except under subdivision (b)(3) of this section or as otherwise provided in this chapter, he or she shall not again become a member of the system.

Upon a member's retirement for a period of not less than ninety (90) days, the member may return to volunteer service with a covered employer and may continue to draw the retirant's annuity if the retirant desires to return to the covered employer and voluntarily waives further service credit in the system or in any other police or firefighter-related pension fund.

Should a former member entitled to a vested annuity provided for in § 24-10-611 reenter covered employment before becoming a retirant, he or she shall cease to be entitled to a vested annuity and shall become a member, with his or her previous credited service reactivated and to be increased by the reemployment.

If a former member entitled to a vested annuity under § 24-10-611 reenters covered employment after becoming a retirant, the former member may again become a member with previous credited service restored and increased by the period of reemployment, but only if the former member:

Was not a participant in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under § 24-10-701;

Was a retirant for at least thirty (30) days; and

Remains reemployed for at least twelve (12) months.

During the time of reemployment, the retirement benefits shall not be paid.

The former member may exercise the reemployment option under this subdivision (c)(2) one (1) time only.

At the end of the period of reemployment, the retirement benefit will be recalculated using service time, including the reemployment service, and final average pay.

However, the final average pay shall be the same final average pay used initially to calculate the retirement benefit unless the period of reemployment lasts at least thirty-six (36) months, in which case the final average pay will be recalculated as defined under § 24-10-102(17).

Upon the retirement of a member whose credited service results from employment with more than one (1) employer, the amount of his or her annuity shall be based upon his or her total credited service in force at the time of his or her retirement and his or her final average pay during the total credited service.

Each employer shall be responsible financially, within the provisions of this chapter, for the portion of the annuity based upon the service credited the member for employment with the employer, and the benefit program to be applied to each portion of credited service shall be the benefit program the employer had in effect at the time the member left the employment of the employer.

Regardless of whether a retirant was a participant in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan, a retirant may return to employment after he or she retires if the retirant:

Was a retirant for at least one hundred eighty (180) days;

In a manner prescribed by the system, waives his or her right to any benefit accrual, including without limitation a benefit provided under § 24-10-607; and

Returns to a covered employer other than the covered employer or covered employers from which he or she retired.

A member contribution shall not be required during the period of a retirant's reemployment under this section.

An employer shall report to the system, in a manner prescribed by the system, that a retirant is an employee of the employer no later than ten (10) calendar days from the date on which the retirant returns to employment with the employer under this section.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall charge an employer of a retirant who returns to employment under this section an employer contribution.

An employer shall remit to the system, in a time and manner prescribed by the system, the employer contribution charged to the employer by the board.

The board may assess penalties according to its rules against an employer who fails to comply with the reporting requirements described in subdivision (e)(3) of this section.

The employer contributions and applicable penalties charged or assessed under this section shall not be eligible for participation in funding with or the receipt of premium tax revenues provided under § 24-11-214.

This subsection does not apply to a retirant who retires under the provisions of § 24-10-607.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3804; Acts 1999, No. 710, § 1; 2003, No. 476, § 1; 2003, No. 1733, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 7; 2019, No. 988, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 988, § 3, provided: “Applicability.

This act applies to a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System who on or after January 1, 2020:

“(1)

Elects to participate in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan;

“(2)

Retires from the system as a participant in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan; or

“(3)

Retires from the system.”

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective until January 1, 2020, see the preceding version.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “waives” for “agrees to sign a waiver to earning any” in (b)(3); added present (c)(2)(A)(i) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; redesignated (c)(2)(D)(1) and (c)(2)(D)(2) as (c)(2)(D)(i) and (c)(2)(D)(ii); substituted “§ 24-10-102(17)” for “§ 24-10-102(15)” in (c)(2)(D)(ii); and deleted (e).

The 2019 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 988, § 2: Jan. 1, 2020.

24-10-505. Public service with other Arkansas systems.

For the purpose of this section, “related system” means any of four (4) retirement systems:

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System;

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The State Police Retirement System; or

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The benefit payable by each related system shall be based upon:

The service credit with that system;

The benefit program the related system had in effect at the time the member terminated service covered by the related system; and

The member's service and pay covered by the related system while the service was being rendered.

During any period that a person is employed in a position covered by a related system, that employee is ineligible to receive a refund of accumulated contributions from any related system in which that employee has service credits and accumulated contributions standing in his or her account. Accumulated contributions may only be refunded when the employee terminates all employment covered by a related system and does not have, in the aggregate, sufficient years of credited service to be eligible for an age and service benefit from any of the related systems.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 357, § 4; 1993, No. 873, § 1; 1997, No. 485, § 8; 1997, No. 1011, § 1; 1997, No. 1024, § 1; 1999, No. 537, § 6; 1999, No. 1070, §§ 1-3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, the repeal by Acts 1999, No. 537, of this section as amended by Acts 1997, No. 1011, was superseded by the amendment by Acts 1999, No. 1070.

24-10-506. Other local police and fire service.

An active member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system equivalent to a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years if the member:

Has at least five (5) years of actual service with the system.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible for purchase under this section;

Had service:

With a local government covered by a municipal policemen's pension and relief fund under § 24-11-401 et seq. or a municipal firemen's relief and pension fund under § 24-11-801 et seq.; or

As a public safety officer or law enforcement officer in an agency for which the service as a public safety officer or law enforcement officer was not covered by the system.

As used in this section, “service as a public safety officer” includes paid service with a municipality that has police officers or firefighters covered under a policemen's pension and relief fund or a firemen's relief and pension fund where the member performed services as a cadet.

Service that is or will be eligible for benefit payment from another plan shall not be eligible for purchase under the system; and

Contributes to the system an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased. This actuarial equivalent would be as of the time of the purchase of credited service and would be determined by the actuary to the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may make the final determination as to:

The length of purchased service credit;

The amount of regular interest to be charged; and

The manner in which payment will be made to the system.

Service credit purchased under this section may be used to determine the member's total credited service for the amount upon retirement and shall not be used to determine his or her final average pay for service under the system.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1084, § 1; 1997, No. 1352, § 1; 1999, No. 1455, § 1; 2007, No. 1057, § 1; 2011, No. 167, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “officer” twice in (a)(2)(A)(ii)(

a

); and added (a)(2)(A)(ii)(

b

The 2013 amendment substituted “An” for “Any” preceding “active” in (a), added the (A) designation in (a)(1); and added (a)(1)(B).

24-10-507. Reciprocal system.

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is a reciprocal system under the provisions of §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405.

In establishing eligibility for a benefit from the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the credited service under all reciprocal systems shall be totaled and the total credited service shall be used in determining eligibility for a system benefit.

In determining the amount of a benefit from this system, there shall be used only the credited service under this system and the benefit formula of this system.

The final average compensation used shall be that of the reciprocal system which furnishes the highest final salary at the time of retirement.

Wherever this system provides a benefit amount which is not dependent on length of credited service, the benefit amount shall be reduced to the proportion that system-credited service bears to total reciprocal system-credited service.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 537, § 4.

24-10-508. Service credit.

An active member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System who has at least five (5) years of actual service and who has service in an Arkansas law enforcement agency or fire department and who has been employed as a public safety or law enforcement officer in any agency not covered by the system or any other system that is reciprocal to the system shall receive credited service for that service.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible under this section.

No additional service credit shall be credited under this section on or after April 1, 2019.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 716, § 1; 2005, No. 1418, § 1; 2011, No. 17, § 5; 2013, No. 1065, § 3; 2019, No. 178, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “active” following “Any” and “actual” preceding the first occurrence of “service.”

The 2013 amendment added the (a) designation, and substituted “An” for “Any” preceding “active member” in (a); and added (b).

The 2019 amendment added (c).

24-10-509. Service credit not years of service.

Service credit granted under § 24-10-508 shall not be considered as years of service for the purpose of benefit calculation.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 716, § 2.

24-10-510. Service credit for former military personnel.

An active member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may purchase credited service in the system equivalent to a period not to exceed five (5) years for service rendered by the member while on active duty in the United States Armed Forces before the member's employment covered by the system, if the member:

Received an honorable discharge from the armed forces;

Has at least five (5) years of actual service in the system.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible for purchase under this section; and

Contributes to the system an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased.

The actuarial equivalent is of the time of the purchase of the credited service and shall be determined by the actuary for the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall make the final determination as to the:

Length of purchased service credit;

Amount of regular interest to be charged; and

Manner in which payment is made to the system.

Service credit purchased under this section shall be used to determine the member's total credited service under the system but shall not be used to determine his or her final average pay under the system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 883, § 1; 2003, No. 474, § 2; 2003, No. 478, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 71; 2009, No. 257, § 1; 2011, No. 91, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 474, § 2 erroneously repealed this section. The error was corrected by the reenactment of § 24-10-510, as amended by Acts 2003, No. 478, § 1, by Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 71.

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 72 provided:

“The enactment and adoption of this act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 84th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (2) and redesignated the following subdivision accordingly; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment substituted “An” for “Any” in (a); added the (A) designation in (a)(2); and added (a)(2)(B).

Subchapter 6
— Benefits

Cross References.

Pension for retired policemen receiving less than one-half salary, § 24-11-424.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 654, § 3: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current provisions for death-in-service benefits under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are unclear with respect to volunteer fire fighters; and that this Act is necessary to prescribe the benefits payable to their survivors and to eliminate the existing confusion. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1989, No. 9, § 5: Feb. 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need to clarification of retirement laws and disability provisions of those laws when a member is permanently injured during the course of their employment that it is in the best interest of this state that this Act to provide such clarification take effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1993, No. 1199, § 5: Apr. 19, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the disability retirement provisions of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System law conflicts with federal laws; that any conflict between federal laws and state laws leads to costly litigation and attorneys' fees; and that changing the laws of the state of Arkansas to eliminate these conflicts in laws will promote the more efficient and effective use of state and local government funds in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote the most proper expenditure of Arkansas state and local government funds, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1136, § 5: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 1242, § 6: Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System law prevents disabled police and fire fighters from receiving the additional benefit of the social security benefits when they become disabled; that officers and firemen who earn eligibility for both of these benefits should be able to enjoy the coverage under both programs; and that the financial condition of some disabled police officers will be enhanced with this change in law becoming effective immediately. Therefore, in order to aid the financial condition of disabled public servants, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved or vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 769, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the annuity options available to retirants of the Local Police and Fire Retirement System do not adequately pay retirants for their earned benefits; that the annuity reductions are too great based on the true actuarial costs of the risks for beneficiary coverage; that the retirant's annuity options should be increased to relieve those excessive costs; and that it is necessary to implement these changes at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1132, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-Third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that disability benefits available under old system fire and police pension funds are more lucrative than under the Local Police and Fire Retirement System; that it promotes increased unit morale to insure that fringe benefits are comparable between police and fire department employees; and that it is administratively beneficial to implement changes at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1133, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-Third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that volunteer firefighters make up the vast majority of fire protection services for the citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a retirement benefit is one of the few means of compensating these brave and selfless public servants for their services to their local communities; that increasing the annuity rate for volunteer firefighters is the best means to repay them for their services; and it is administratively necessary to implement this benefit increase at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1536, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an earlier cutoff of the temporary annuities provided for by the Local Police and Fire Retirement System can force a retiree to take an earlier Social Security retirement benefit than they would otherwise choose; that extending these annuities until a later age will give more flexibility to the police officers and fire fighters to plan the age at which they wish to retire; and that the most administratively efficient time to make changes to retirement system laws is with the beginning of the State's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 473, § 6: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that long term members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are entitled to the maximum benefits under the system; that increases in annuity options will provide an added level of benefit for vital public safety employees covered under the system; that implementing the benefit option will be administratively most-efficient on July 1, 2003; and that because of this economy of scale and efficiency consideration for the retirement system this act should take effect on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 475, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits for the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are redetermined on July 1 of each year; that delaying the effective date of this act will result in a one-year loss of benefit increases that compounding will give to the members; that this one-year loss of increased benefits will impair the financial well being of members; and this act must take effect on the next July 1. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 481, § 3: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain individuals under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System were injured and disabled in the actual performance of duties as an employee before July 1, 2001; that those members did not receive the advantage of the benefit increase of Act 1132 of 2001; that this inequity has worked a financial hardship on individuals who were injured before the benefit was given to those members after July 1, 2001; and that those individuals who were not granted benefits under that law should have benefits restored as soon as possible and to have this act applied retroactively. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 777, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the benefits for members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are inadequate; that the benefits should be increased to continue to motivate the emergency service employees of our local governments; that the most beneficial time to increase the benefits is during the beginning of the state fiscal year; and this act is necessary to take effect at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2009, No. 720, § 6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that economic conditions have resulted in the need to increase retirement benefits; that it is sound public policy to increase the retirement benefit multiplier; and that the increase should be funded by an increase in the member's contribution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1316, § 3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that members under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are currently paying income tax on the employer's contribution to their retirement account; that other members of state-supported retirement systems are not required to pay income tax on their employer's contributions; and that the members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System should receive pre-tax employer contributions. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 7: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 315, § 3: Mar. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1065, § 15, as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 1: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 2: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1065 of 2013 was enacted with an erroneous emergency clause; that the error needs to be rectified as quickly as possible to effect the will of the General Assembly; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will correct and address the error found in the emergency clause of Act 1065 of 2013. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 178, § 9: Mar. 31, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are complex; that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members; that these statutes are imminently in need of revision and updating in order to conform with competent public pension policy and prevent any possible exploitation of the benefit structure of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System; that the calculation of certain retirement benefits is in need of clarification; that there is a need for certainty with regard to benefit accruals that are applicable to new members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on March 31, 2019”.

24-10-601. Generally.

No benefit shall be paid by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System based upon pay which is covered by any other retirement plan, except Social Security.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805.